Utah statutes.
26-1-12.   Executive director -- Power to order abatement of public health hazard.

If the executive director finds that a condition of filth, sanitation, or other health hazard exists which creates a clear present hazard to the public health and which requires immediate action to protect human health or safety, the executive director with the concurrence of the governor may order persons causing or contributing to the condition to reduce, discontinue, or ameliorate it to the extent that the public health hazard is eliminated.



Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

